Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-15,122
Revenue; how treated.

The operation of housing developments and the other activities permitted to be undertaken by a local housing agency under the Nebraska Housing Agency Act, and all income, fees, or revenue derived or generated therefrom and belonging to such local housing agency, are for public uses and purposes, are not used or held for profit, and are governmental functions of state concern. No income, fees, or revenue received by a local housing agency, from whatever source, shall be used as a source of revenue for any city or county establishing the local housing agency or for any other public agency, nor shall any net income, fees, or net revenue be considered profit, but all of the same shall be utilized in the furtherance of the maintenance and enhancement of an adequate supply of decent, safe, and sanitary housing that is affordable to persons of eligible income and for other purposes contemplated by the act.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 51.